District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1712

Quarters for Board; compensation of Board members; appointment and compensation of clerks, inspectors, and other personnel; payment of expenses of Board

Repealed.

History

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245, § 38(a), 40 DCR 660

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-401 to 2-419.